Hawaii statutes.
[§373L-1.5 Names; registration of
person required.] No person within the purview of this chapter shall use
the terms "professional employer organization", or "PEO",
or other similar name unless the person is registered and in compliance with
this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. [L 2013, c 174, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next